Hawaii statutes.
PART 7.
RULES OF CONSTRUCTION APPLICABLE TO WILLS

AND OTHER
GOVERNING INSTRUMENTS

§560:2-701 Scope. In the absence of a
finding of a contrary intention, the rules of construction in this part control
the construction of a governing instrument. The rules of construction in this
part apply to a governing instrument of any type, except as the application of
a particular section is limited by its terms to a specific type or types of
provision or governing instrument. [L 1996, c 288, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next